Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.13.160

Oath and bond of officers.

All provisions of RCW 35A.12.080 relating to oaths and bonds of officers, shall be applicable to code cities organized under this council-manager plan.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.13.160.]